Connecticut, session 2026, SB00370.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Commencing July 1, 2026, and
each fiscal year thereafter, the Commissioner of Administrative Services
shall adjust the hourly compensation for adjunct fire instructors
employed by the Connecticut Fire Academy at the same percentage rate
as any general wage increase and cost-of-living adjustment included
within the most recently ratified agreement between the state and the
State Employees Bargaining Agent Coalition.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026